Illinois, session 104th, SB123.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The School Code is amended by adding Section 52-3.25g-5 as follows: 6    (105 ILCS 5/2-3.25g-5 new)7    Sec. 2-3.25g-5. Waiver Process Task Force. 8    (a) The Waiver Process Task Force is created. The Task 9Force shall consist of the following voting members:10        (1) a member of the General Assembly, appointed by the 11    Speaker of the House of Representatives;12        (2) a member of the General Assembly, appointed by the 13    Minority Leader of the House of Representatives;14        (3) a member of the General Assembly, appointed by the 15    President of the Senate;16        (4) a member of the General Assembly, appointed by the 17    Minority Leader of the Senate;18        (5) the Lieutenant Governor or his or her designee;19        (6) the State Superintendent of Education or his or 20    her designee, who shall serve as a co-chairperson of the 21    Task Force;22        (7) the Director of Public Health or his or her 23    designee, who shall serve as a co-chairperson of the Task   SB0123- 2 -LRB104 06330 LNS 16365 b1    Force;2        (8) the Chief Executive Officer of City of Chicago 3    School District 299, appointed by the Chicago Board of 4    Education;5        (9) 2 representatives from a statewide organization 6    representing health, physical education, recreation, and 7    dance, appointed by the head of that organization, of 8    which one representative is a current teacher and one is a 9    retired teacher;10        (10) a representative of City of Chicago School 11    District 299, appointed by the Chicago Board of Education;12        (11) 2 representatives of a statewide professional 13    teachers' organization, appointed by the head of that 14    organization;15        (12) 2 representatives of a statewide professional 16    teachers' organization other than the statewide 17    professional teachers' organization in paragraph (11), 18    appointed by the head of that organization;19        (13) a representative of an organization representing 20    professional teachers in a city having a population of 21    more than 500,000, appointed by the head of that 22    organization;23        (14) a representative of a statewide organization 24    representing principals, appointed by the head of that 25    organization;26        (15) a representative of a statewide organization   SB0123- 3 -LRB104 06330 LNS 16365 b1    representing school administrators, appointed by the head 2    of that organization;3        (16) a representative of a statewide organization 4    representing school boards, appointed by the head of that 5    organization;6        (17) a representative of a statewide organization 7    representing school business officials, appointed by the 8    head of that organization;9        (18) a representative of a statewide organization 10    representing parents, appointed by the head of that 11    organization;12        (19) a representative of a national research and 13    advocacy organization focused on cardiovascular health and 14    wellness, appointed by the head of that organization;15        (20) a representative of an organization that 16    advocates for healthy school environments, appointed by 17    the head of that organization;18        (21) a representative of a not-for-profit organization 19    serving children and youth, appointed by the head of that 20    organization;21        (22) a representative of a not-for-profit organization 22    that partners to promote prevention and improve public 23    health systems that maximize the health and quality of 24    life of the people of this State, appointed by the head of 25    that organization;26        (23) a representative of a statewide organization   SB0123- 4 -LRB104 06330 LNS 16365 b1    representing driver education and safety, appointed by the 2    head of that organization;3        (24) a representative of a statewide organization 4    representing adapted physical education, appointed by the 5    head of that organization;6        (25) a representative of a statewide organization 7    representing health education, appointed by the head of 8    that organization; and9        (26) a representative from a regional office of 10    education, appointed by the State Superintendent of 11    Education.12    Additional members may be appointed to the Task Force with 13the approval of the co-chairpersons. All members of the Task 14Force shall serve without compensation.15    (b) The Task Force shall meet at the call of the 16co-chairpersons, with the initial meeting of the Task Force 17being held as soon as possible after the effective date of this 18amendatory Act of the 104th General Assembly.19    (c) The State Board of Education and the Department of 20Public Health shall provide assistance and necessary staff 21support services to the Task Force.22    (d) The purposes of the Task Force are to:23        (1) examine the current waiver response process and 24    make recommendations on a more equitable and fair waiver 25    response at the elementary and secondary school levels in 26    this State, including educating and promoting leadership   SB0123- 5 -LRB104 06330 LNS 16365 b1    on the waiver response process among school districts and 2    school officials;3        (2) develop and use metrics to access the viability of 4    waiver requests and the impact of such requests on 5    students in kindergarten through grade 12;6        (3) promote training and professional development on 7    creating waiver requests that include accountability 8    measures for teachers and other community stakeholders 9    across this State;10        (4) identify and seek local, State, and national 11    resources to support an equitable and fair waiver process; 12    and13        (5) complete such other strategies as may be 14    identified by the Task Force.15    (e) The Task Force shall make recommendations to the 16Governor and the General Assembly on how waivers should be 17requested, how waivers should be reviewed for approval, and 18how to demonstrate the ability to fulfill accountability 19measures proposed in requested waivers. The Task Force shall 20focus on updating the waiver request process, the waiver 21acceptance or denial process, and ways to hold waiver 22applicants accountable for meeting the stated goals of 23waivers.24    (f) On or before December 31, 2025, the Task Force must 25report its recommendations by filing copies of its report with 26the Governor and the General Assembly. Upon filing its report,   SB0123- 6 -LRB104 06330 LNS 16365 b1the Task Force is dissolved.2    (g) This Section is repealed on January 1, 2027.  3    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 4becoming law.